it: Sistema di gancio per ruota di filatura: Ganci fissi; Altro/non specificato; Gancio scorrevole; Stile WooLee Winder/avanzamento automatico; Altro
nb: Kroksystem for spinnehjul: Faste kroker; Annet / ikke spesifisert; Glidende krok; WooLee Winder / automatisk fremmating; Annet
el: Σύστημα γάντζων τροχού γνεσίματος: Σταθεροί γάντζοι; Άλλο/Δεν καθορίζεται; Συρόμενος γάντζος; WooLee Winder/Σύστημα αυτόματης προώθησης; Άλλο
pt-PT: Sistema de gancho da roda giratória: Ganchos fixos; Outro/não especificado; Gancho deslizante; WooLee Winder/estilo de avanço automático; Outro
sv: Spinnrockens kroksystem: Fasta krokar; Annat/ospecificerat; Flyttbar krok; WooLee Winder/stil med automatisk frammatning; Annat
cs: Systém háků na kolovrat: Pevné háčky; Jiné / nespecifikováno; Posuvný háček; Styl WooLee Winder / automatický posun; Jiné
lt-LT: Verpimo ratelio kabliukų sistema: Fiksuoti kabliukai; Kita / nenurodyta; Slankiojantis kabliukas; „WooLee Winder“ / automatinio stūmimo stilius; Kita
da: Krogsystem for spinderok: Faste kroge; Andet/ikke specificeret; Glidende krog; WooLee Winder / auto-advance-stil; Andet
ru: Система крючков прялки: Фиксированные крючки; Другое/Не указано; Скользящий крючок; WooLee Winder / автоматическое распределение нити; Другое
zh-CN: 纺车钩系统: 固定挂钩; 其他/未指定; 滑动挂钩; WooLee Winder/自动推进式; 其他
hu: Forgókerék kampórendszere: Fix horgok; Egyéb/nincs megadva; Csúszóhorog; WooLee Winder/automatikus továbbítású; Egyéb
sl-SI: Sistem kljukic kolovrata: Fiksni kavlji; Drugo/ni določeno; Drsivi kavelj; Sistem WooLee Winder/samodejno pomikanje; Drugo
th: ระบบขอเกี่ยวล้อหมุน: ตะขอแบบติดตาย; อื่นๆ/ไม่ระบุ; ตะขอเลื่อนได้; วูลีไวน์เดอร์/แบบเดินหน้าอัตโนมัติ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Система с кука на предачното колело: Фиксирани куки; Друго/неуточнено; Плъзгаща се кука; WooLee Winder/с автоматично придвижване; Друго
vi: Hệ thống móc quay sợi: Móc cố định; Khác/Không chỉ định; Móc trượt; Kiểu WooLee Winder/tự động cuốn; Khác
sk-SK: Systém pohonu kolovratu: Pevné háčiky; Iné/nešpecifikované; Posuvný háčik; V štýle WooLee Winder/automatického posunu; Iné
fi: Rukin koukkujärjestelmä: Kiinteät koukut; Muu / ei määritetty; Liukukoukku; WooLee Winder / automaattisesti siirtyvä; Muu
en: Spinning wheel hook system: Fixed hooks; Other/Not specified; Sliding hook; WooLee Winder/auto-advance style; Other
de: Hakensystem des Spinnrads: Feste Haken; Sonstige/Nicht angegeben; Schiebehaken; WooLee Winder/Auto-Advance-Stil; Sonstige
nl: Spinnewiel haaksysteem: Vaste haken; Overige/niet gespecificeerd; Schuifhaak; WooLee Winder/automatische doorvoerstijl; Overige
ko: 스피닝 휠 후크 체계: 고정 후크; 기타/지정되지 않음; 슬라이딩 후크; 우릴리 와인더(WooLee Winder)/자동 전진 스타일; 기타
hr-HR: Sustav kuka za kotačiće za predenje: Fiksne kuke; Ostalo / nije navedeno; Klizna kuka; WooLee Winder / sustav automatskog pomicanja; Ostalo
ja: 紡ぎ車フックシステム: 固定フック; その他/未指定; スライドフック; WooLee Winder/オートアドバンススタイル; その他
ro-RO: Sistem de cârlige pentru roata de tors: Cârlige fixe; Altele/Nespecificat; Cârlig glisant; WooLee Winder/stil auto-avans; Altele
pl: Układ haków do kołowrotka: Stałe haczyki; Inne / nie określono; Przesuwany haczyk; WooLee Winder / z automatycznym posuwem; Inne
zh-TW: 紡車鉤系統: 固定鉤; 其他/未指定; 滑動鉤; WooLee Winder/自動推進式; 其他
es: Sistema de gancho para la rueca: Ganchos fijos; Otro/no especificado; Gancho deslizante; WooLee Winder/estilo de avance automático; Otro
fr: Système de crochets du rouet: Crochets fixes; Autre / Non spécifié; Crochet coulissant; WooLee Winder / style à avance automatique; Autre
pt-BR: Roda de fiar sistema de ganchos: Ganchos fixos; Outros/não especificado; Gancho deslizante; Estilo WooLee Winder/avanço automático; Outros
tr: Eğirme çarkı kanca sistemi: Sabit kancalar; Diğer/belirtilmemiş; Kayar kanca; WooLee Winder/otomatik ilerlemeli; Diğer